Utah statutes.
13-14-303.   Effect of terminating a franchise.
If under Section 13-14-301 the executive director permits a franchisor to
terminate or not continue a franchise and prohibits the franchisor from
entering into a franchise for the sale of new motor vehicles of a line-make in
a relevant market area, the franchisor may not enter into a franchise for the
sale of new motor vehicles of that line-make in the specified relevant market
area unless the executive director determines, after a recommendation by the
advisory board, that there has been a change of circumstances so that the
relevant market area at the time of the establishment of the new franchise
agreement can reasonably be expected to support the new franchisee.
